Utah statutes.
59-15-101.   Tax basis -- Rate.

(1) (a)  A tax is imposed at the rate specified in Subsection (1)(b) on all beer, as defined in Section 32B-1-102, that is imported or manufactured for sale, use, or distribution in this state.

(b)  The tax described in Subsection (1)(a) shall be imposed at a rate of:

(i)  $11 per 31-gallon barrel for beer imported or manufactured:

(A)  before July 1, 2003; and

(B)  for sale, use, or distribution in this state; and

(ii)  $12.80 per 31-gallon barrel for beer imported or manufactured:

(A)  on or after July 1, 2003; and

(B)  for sale, use, or distribution in this state.

(c)  The tax imposed under this Subsection (1):

(i)  shall be imposed at a proportionate rate for:

(A)  any quantity of beer other than a 31-gallon barrel; or

(B)  the fractional parts of a 31-gallon barrel; and

(ii)  may not be imposed more than once on the same beer.

(2)  A tax may not be imposed on beer:

(a)  sold to the United States and its agencies; or

(b) (i)  manufactured or imported for sale, use, or distribution outside the state; and

(ii)  exported from the state.



Amended by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

